Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB598.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "truck stop establishment" in section 3102 of Title 4 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 3102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this part shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Truck stop establishment." A premises that:(1) Is equipped with diesel islands used for fueling commercial motor vehicles.[(2) Has sold on average 50,000 gallons of diesel or biodiesel fuel each month for the previous 12 months or is projected to sell an average of 50,000 gallons of diesel or 12345678910111213141516171819 biodiesel fuel each month for the next 12 months.](3) Has at least 20 parking spaces dedicated for commercial motor vehicles.(4) Has a convenience store.(5) Is situated on a parcel of land of not less than three acres that the truck stop establishment owns or leases.(6) Is not located on any property owned by the Pennsylvania Turnpike.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0598PN0606 - 2 - 12345678910